Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1703
Security interest; when valid.

A security interest in rents shall be valid and binding between the parties to an assignment instrument upon the execution and delivery of the assignment instrument by the assignor to the assignee.

Laws 1993, LB 14, § 3.